Washington statutes.
RCW 11.76.160

Liability of personal representative.

Whenever a decree shall have been made by the court for the payment of creditors, the personal representative shall be personally liable to each creditor for his or her claim or the dividend thereon, except when his or her inability to make the payment thereof from the property of the estate shall result without fault upon his or her part. The personal representative shall likewise be liable on his or her bond to each creditor.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2070; 1965 c 145 s 11.76.160. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 176; RRS s 1546; prior: 1891 c 155 s 35; Code 1881 s 1568; 1854 p 299 s 190.]